src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

kiä:k PRON-INTERR-HUM  "" ;
maq:m PERS-SG1  "" ;
miiq:m PERS-PL1  "" ;
miä:m PRON-INTERR_miä  "" ;
saq:s PERS-SG2  "" ;
tiiq:t PERS-PL2  "" ;
timä:t PERS-SG3  "" ;
